Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 1. Branding and Ranging

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

4 Am. Jur. 2d Animals §§ 8, 9, 20, 40 to 42, 75, 112.

Liability for injury to vehicle or person riding therein by animal at large in street or highway, 59 ALR2d 1328.

Liability for personal injury or death caused by trespassing or intruding livestock, 88 ALR2d 709, 44 ALR4th 678.

Liability for injury to trespassing stock from poisonous substances on the premises, 12 ALR3d 1103.

3A C.J.S. Animals §§ 4 to 10, 16 to 37, 121, 122, 137 to 169.

§ 11-20-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Agency” means the corporation, if any, designated by the board as its authorized representative to carry out the functions to be performed by the board and if there is no such agency, then it means the board;

“Board” means the Wyoming livestock board;

“Inspectors” means those persons appointed by the agency to execute the duties prescribed by law, rules, regulations and orders for the protection of the livestock industry in Wyoming;

“Livestock” means cattle, horses, mules, asses and sheep. The board acting in conjunction with the game and fish commission may designate individual bison or identifiable herds of bison as wildlife;

“Stock drover” means any person driving livestock through any county in Wyoming;

“Stock owner” means any person who owns livestock;

“This act” means W.S.

11-19-101

through

11-19-506

,

11-20-101

through

11-24-115

and

11-30-101

through

11-30-115

;

“Brand” means a brand, mark or other board approved means of identification including any electronic device used for livestock identification.

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 39, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 1987; C.S. 1910, § 2597; C.S. 1920, § 3090; R.S. 1931, § 67-202; C.S. 1945, § 56-502; W.S. 1957, § 11-319; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 3; 1973, ch. 61, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

11-23-101

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1979, ch. 63, § 2; 1994, ch. 96, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2007, ch. 105, § 1; 2010, ch. 61, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(vii), substituted “11-30-115” for “11-30-112.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(iv) deleted “and” preceding “sheep” and inserted “, goats, llamas and alpacas” following “sheep.”

The 2010 amendment,

in (a)(iv), substituted “asses and sheep” for “asses, sheep, goats, llamas and alpacas.”

Laws 2010, ch. 61, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2010.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Several sections included in the definition of “[t]his act” have been repealed.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Law reviews. —

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

§ 11-20-102.
Stock running at large to be branded.

Every stock owner allowing
his livestock over six (6) months old to run at large or mingle with
livestock other than his own, shall brand his livestock with his recorded
brand.

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 39, § 14; R.S. 1899, § 1988; C.S. 1910, § 2598; C.S. 1920, § 3091; R.S. 1931, § 67-203; C.S. 1945, § 56-516; W.S. 1957, § 11-323; W.S. 1977, §

11-23-103

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-20-103.
Brands;
application; contents; recording fees; refund; disposition thereof.

Any person desiring to adopt any brand to be used to brand livestock in this state, shall before using the brand make application to the Wyoming livestock board. The application shall:

Contain a facsimile or a description of the brand;

State the species of livestock for which the brand is to be used;

State the place on the animal where the brand will be applied, and whether it is to be applied with hot iron, paint, tattoo or other means;

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 25, § 2.

The application shall be accompanied by a recording fee of not less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00) for the first species of livestock and not less than seventy-five dollars ($75.00) for each additional species of livestock for which the brand is to be used. In the event a brand is not recorded, twenty-five percent (25%) of the recording fee shall be retained by the Wyoming livestock board and the balance of the fee shall be refunded to the applicant. A certified copy of the recorded brand shall be given to the owner. All fees collected shall be deposited into the account created by W.S.

11-20-405

.

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 69, § 204.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 44, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 2601; Laws 1913, ch. 126, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 3093; Laws 1921, ch. 13, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 67-205; C.S. 1945, § 56-507; Laws 1953, ch. 39, § 1; 1957, ch. 163, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 11-324; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 4; 1965, ch. 103, § 1; 1973, ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, §§

11-23-104

, 11-23-121; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 18, § 1; 1994, ch. 96, § 1; 1996, ch. 25, § 2; 2006, ch. 39, § 2; 2007, ch. 105, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 204.

The 2006 amendment,

inserted the second sentence in (b) and added (c).

Laws 2006 ch. 39, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2006.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (b) substituted “not less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00)” for “one hundred dollars ($100.00)”, substituted “not less than seventy-five dollars ($75.00” for “fifty dollars ($50.00)”, substituted “twenty-five percent (25%)” for “twenty-five dollars ($25.00).”

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, repealed former (c), which read: “Brand applications under this section may be charged a surcharge pursuant to W.S. 11-20-405(c).”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 105, § 3, states as follows: “The brand recording and inspection fees specified in this act shall remain at the levels in effect on July 1, 2007, and shall not be adjusted before December 31, 2007. After December 31, 2007, the board may adjust the fees specified in this act subject to the limitations specified in W.S. 11-20-408(b).”

§ 11-20-104.
Brands; recording generally.

Upon receipt of the application
and fee the brand shall be recorded in the state brand record. If
the brand has been previously recorded the executive officer of the
board shall suggest a brand that can be recorded. The executive officer
of the board shall not record any brand which in his opinion would
conflict with any brand of record.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 44, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 2601; Laws 1913, ch. 126, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 3093; Laws 1921, ch. 13, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 67-205; C.S. 1945, § 56-507; Laws 1953, ch. 39, § 1; 1957, ch. 163, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 11-324; W.S. 1977, §

11-23-104

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1994, ch. 96, § 1; 1996, ch. 25, § 1.

Cited

in

Estate of Harris v. Harris, 218 F.3d 1140, 2000 U.S. App. LEXIS 15704 (10th Cir. 2000).

§ 11-20-105.
Brands; extension to other species.

If a recorded brand is
used exclusively for the identification of a particular species of
livestock, the executive officer of the board may record the identical
brand in the name of another person to identify his ownership of a
species of livestock other than the species for which the brand is
presently recorded.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 44, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 2601; Laws 1913, ch. 126, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 3093; Laws 1921, ch. 13, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 67-205; C.S. 1945, § 56-507; Laws 1957, ch. 163, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 11-324; W.S. 1977, §

11-23-104

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-20-106.
Brands; sheep; districts created; recording thereof.

To increase the quantity
of brands which can be effectively used for the identification of
sheep, the executive officer of the board may, with the advice of
the executive committee of the Wyoming wool growers association, promulgate
and enforce rules and regulations necessary to divide the land area
of Wyoming into districts. The districts shall be made a part of such
brands and recorded in the state record as further identification
of sheep.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 44, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 2601; Laws 1913, ch. 126, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 3093; Laws 1921, ch. 13, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 67-205; C.S. 1945, § 56-507; Laws 1957, ch. 163, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 11-324; W.S. 1977, §

11-23-104

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-20-107.
Brands; records kept by board; inspection thereof.

The board shall keep
an accurate record of all certified livestock brands, the names of
the owners and their current contact information including addresses, which shall be open to public inspection.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 21, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 2002; C.S. 1910, § 2610; C.S. 1920, § 3103; R.S. 1931, § 67-215; C.S. 1945, § 56-518; W.S. 1957, § 11-325; W.S. 1977, §

11-23-105

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2013 ch. 13, §
1, effective February 12, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “current contact information including addresses” for “post office addresses.”

Laws 2013, ch. 13, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved February 12, 2013.

§ 11-20-108.
Recorded brand; certified copy deemed prima facie evidence of ownership.

A certified copy of any
brand recorded in the office of the board is prima facie evidence
of ownership of animals branded therewith for that species of livestock
recorded by the board. The brand shall be received as evidence of
ownership in all legal proceedings involving title to the animal.

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 126, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 3095; R.S. 1931, § 67-207; C.S. 1945, § 56-509; Laws 1953, ch. 39, § 2; 1957, ch. 163, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 11-326; W.S. 1977, §

11-23-106

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1994, ch. 96, § 1.

Construction. —

The statute provides only for prima facie evidence of ownership, and such evidence may be rebutted. Estate of Harris v. Harris, 218 F.3d 1140, 2000 U.S. App. LEXIS 15704 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2000).

Evidence of brand ownership is prima facie evidence of animal
ownership. —

In prosecution for willfully and maliciously killing a head of neat cattle, evidence that brand, a certified copy of which was introduced in evidence, was owned by certain persons, was prima facie evidence that such persons owned animal bearing such brand, even though such persons, though witnesses, failed to testify directly that they owned the animal bearing such brand. Wiggin v. State, 28 Wyo. 480, 206 P. 373,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1922).

Evidence conclusively rebutted the presumption of ownership created by the presence of brands on cattle where the rights and duties of the owner of the brand were only to pasture and feed the cattle in exchange for a share of the calf crop pursuant to a share agreement. Estate of Harris v. Harris, 218 F.3d 1140, 2000 U.S. App. LEXIS 15704 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2000).

Effect of multiple brands. —

The presumption engendered by a newer brand does not trump that engendered by an older brand under all circumstances. Estate of Harris v. Harris, 218 F.3d 1140, 2000 U.S. App. LEXIS 15704 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2000).

Cited

in

Megown v. Fuller, 38 Wyo. 211, 266 P. 124,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(1928).

§ 11-20-109.
Recorded brand; considered as property; subject to sale; written
instrument required; acknowledgment and recording.

Any brand recorded as
required by law is the property of the person in whose name it is
recorded, and is subject to sale, assignment, transfer, devise and
descent as personal property. Instruments of writing evidencing sale,
assignment or transfer shall be acknowledged and recorded in the office
of the board. Acknowledgment and recording of such instruments have
the same effect as to third parties as the acknowledgment and recording
of instruments affecting real estate.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 44, § 6; C.S. 1910, § 2604; Laws 1913, ch. 126, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 3097; R.S. 1931, § 67-209; C.S. 1945, § 56-511; W.S. 1957, § 11-327; W.S. 1977, §

11-23-107

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1994, ch. 96, § 1; 1996, ch. 25, § 1.

Property interest. —

Pursuant to this section, a livestock brand owner has a property interest in his brand as long as the brand remains properly recorded. Tate v. Wyoming Livestock Bd., 932 P.2d 746,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1997).

§ 11-20-110.
Recorded brand; bill of sale; when title vests.

Any recorded brand may
be conveyed to another by a bill of sale executed by the vendor, properly
acknowledged, but the conveyance is not complete nor does title to
the brand vest in the vendee until the bill of sale is filed for record and the ownership of the brand is transferred in the office of the board.

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 39, § 15; R.S. 1899, § 2000; C.S. 1910, § 2609; Laws 1913, ch. 126, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 3102; R.S. 1931, § 67-214; C.S. 1945, § 56-517; W.S. 1957, § 11-328; W.S. 1977, §

11-23-108

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1994, ch. 96, § 1; 1996, ch. 25, § 1; 2013 ch. 13, §
1., effective February 12, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

added “and the ownership of the brand is transferred.”

Laws 2013, ch. 13, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved February 12, 2013.

§ 11-20-111.
State brand book; contents.

The executive officer
of the board shall procure a suitable book, to be known as the state
brand book, in which shall be recorded the brand and the definite
place of the brand upon the animal, used for the branding of livestock
in this state. A suitable book under this
section may, at the discretion of the board, include a printed copy,
an electronic copy or both.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 44, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 2599; C.S. 1920, § 3092; R.S. 1931, § 67-204; C.S. 1945, § 56-506; W.S. 1957, § 11-329; W.S. 1977, § 11-23-109; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2013 ch. 13, §
1., effective February 12, 2012.

The 2013 amendment,

added the last sentence in the section.

Laws 2013, ch. 13, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved February 12, 2013.

Editor's notes. —

Section 2, ch. 44, Laws 1909, required the recording in the state brand book as of the brands then in use.

Sameness of brand is jury question. —

Where in an attempted foreclosure of chattel mortgage on cattle, which did not cover the increase, it appeared that animals originally mortgaged had ceased to exist leaving no increase, but that those in possession of mortgagor at time of foreclosure were different to cattle acquired subsequent to the mortgage, the foreclosing mortgagee had no lien on such cattle and question whether the brand, without describing its location on the animal, was same as that on cattle in possession at time of foreclosure, was for the jury. P.J. Black Lumber Co. v. Turk, 50 Wyo. 361, 62 P.2d 519,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(1936).

Variance as to ownership of cow. —

Where indictment alleged larceny of cow belonging to A.B., and proof showed it to belong to A.B., Jr., there was no fatal variance; the addition of “Jr.” to a name being a mere matter of description. Harris v. State, 23 Wyo. 487, 153 P. 881,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1916).

§ 11-20-112.
Brand book; publication; form and contents; distribution of copies;
monthly lists and biennial supplements; costs; disposition of proceeds.

The board shall publish
a brand book containing facsimiles or descriptions of all brands recorded
in Wyoming together with the owner’s name and address. The names and
brands shall be arranged in the most convenient form for reference.
Copies of the brand book and copies of subsequent supplements shall
be given to the agency. At the end of each month, the board shall
prepare lists of the brands recorded during that month and shall issue
biennial supplements to the brand book which shall supersede and cumulate
the monthly lists issued during the biennium. The board may publish
and sell brand books, lists and supplements. The proceeds from the
sales shall be deposited in the account created by W.S.

11-20-405

.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 44, § 7; C.S. 1910, § 2605; Laws 1913, ch. 126, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 3098; R.S. 1931, § 67-210; Laws 1937, ch. 12, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 56-512; W.S. 1957, § 11-330; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 5; 1973, ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, § 11-23-110; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1994, ch. 96, § 1; 1996, ch. 25, § 1.

§ 11-20-113.
County clerk prohibited from recording brands.

It is unlawful for any
county clerk in this state to record any brand or bill of sale of
any brand.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 44, § 5; C.S. 1910, § 2603; Laws 1913, ch. 126, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 3096; R.S. 1931, § 67-208; C.S. 1945, § 56-510; W.S. 1957, § 11-331; W.S. 1977, § 11-23-111; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1994, ch. 96, § 1.

§ 11-20-114.
Failure to
record brand deemed abandonment.

Failure to record a brand is an abandonment of the same. No person shall claim or use any abandoned brand until after he has caused the same to be recorded as required by law.

Any person violating subsection (a) of this section shall be punished as provided by W.S.

11-1-103

.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 23, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 1997; Laws 1909, ch. 44, § 8; C.S. 1910, § 2606; C.S. 1920, § 3099; R.S. 1931, § 67-211; C.S. 1945, § 56-513; W.S. 1957, § 11-332; W.S. 1977, § 11-23-112; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1994, ch. 96, § 1; 2001, ch. 26, § 1; 2013 ch. 13, §
1., effective February 12, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

deleted the former first sentence in (a), which read: “No person shall claim or own any brand which has not been recorded in the office of the Wyoming livestock board.”

Laws 2013, ch. 13, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved February 12, 2013.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Ownership of Livestock Brands and Marks as Affected by Chattel Mortgages,” see 1 Wyo. L.J. 68.

§ 11-20-115.
Rerecording; when required; notice; abandonment.

Every owner of a brand shall rerecord the brand according to the applicable time periods established by the board pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, and failure to do so is an abandonment of the brand as provided in this section. At least sixty (60) days preceding the expiration date of the brand, the board shall notify by mail and electronic mail if provided, at the address shown on the brand records, the owner of the brand that the brand must be rerecorded and if the brand has not been rerecorded within sixty (60) days from the expiration date of the brand, the brand will be declared delinquent. The board shall send a second notice by certified mail to the owner of the brand at the address shown on the brand records within thirty (30) days following the expiration date of the brand. A delinquent brand may be rerecorded by the brand owner who shall submit a rerecording application and pay a delinquent fee as established by rule of the board not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00). If a delinquent brand is not rerecorded within two (2) years from the expiration date of the brand, the brand will be declared abandoned. Not less than six (6) months before declaring a brand abandoned, the board shall send a notice of proposed brand abandonment to the owner of the brand at the address shown on the brand records. The livestock board is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement this section including rules for issuing abandoned brands to other applicants.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 148, § 3.

The term of the rerecording period shall be in ten (10) year increments, not to exceed one hundred (100) years at the option of the owner of the brand. The renewal schedule and the method of renewal shall be established by the board. Every owner of a brand shall rerecord the brand pursuant to the renewal schedule established by the board and shall pay the renewal fee specified by W.S.

11-20-116

which shall be prorated by the board for any renewal of less than ten (10) years.

As part of a rerecording notice or abandonment notice sent under subsection (a) of this section, the board shall offer the option to the owner of the brand to rerecord all brands owned by the same person upon payment of a prorated fee, whether or not the brand has reached its rerecording date and provided that the rerecording period shall not exceed the term established by subsection (c) of this section. The board shall offer the option to the owner of the brand to extend the rerecording period in ten (10) year increments not to exceed one hundred (100) years upon payment of the appropriate fee as specified in W.S. 11-20-116(a).

The owner of a brand declared delinquent under subsection (a) of this section may provide payment in full of the required recording fee and any delinquency fees at the time of brand inspection.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 23, § 7; R.S. 1899, § 1998; Laws 1909, ch. 44, § 9; C.S. 1910, § 2607; Laws 1913, ch. 126, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 3100; Laws 1923, ch. 41, § 1; 1925, ch. 9, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 67-212; Laws 1935, ch. 31, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 56-514; W.S. 1957, § 11-333; W.S. 1977, § 11-23-113; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1994, ch. 96, § 1; 2001, ch. 26, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 203; 2013 ch. 13, §
1, effective February 12, 2013; 2020 ch. 76, § 1, effective March 12, 2020.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (b), deleted “Effective January 1, 2005” at the beginning.

The 2013 amendment,

rewrote (a).

Laws 2013, ch. 13, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved February 12, 2013.

The 2019 amendments. —

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 148 § 2, effective July 1, 2019, in (a), substituted “provided in W.S.

11-20-126

” for “provided by subsection (b) of this section,” “by mail and electronic mail if provided” for “by mail,” and “two (2) years” for “two (2) years,” and added the sixth sentence; in (c), substituted “The term of the rerecording period shall not exceed ten (10) years and the method of renewal shall be established by the board. Every owner” for “After the rerecording periods established by the board under subsection (b) of this section, every owner,” and added “which shall be prorated by the board for any renewal of less than ten (10) years” at the end; and added (d) and (e).

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 148 § 3, effective July 1, 2019, repealed (b), which read: “Every owner of a brand shall rerecord the brand. The term of the rerecording period shall not exceed the term established by this section and the method of renewal shall be established by the board. The renewal fee shall be as established by W.S.

11-20-116

and shall be prorated by the board for any renewal less than ten (10) years. The board shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.”

The third 2019 amendment, by ch. 186, § 4(a), effective July 1, 2019, in (d), substituted “a rerecording notice” for “any rerecording notice.”

The 2020 amendment,

in (a) substituted “Every owner of a brand shall rerecord the brand according to the applicable time periods established by the board pursuant to subsection (c) of this section” for “Except as provided in W.S.

11-20-126

, every tenth year after recording a brand, every owner of a brand shall rerecord the brand,” “owner of the brand” for “party owning the brand” throughout; in (c) substituted “shall be in ten (10) year increments, not to exceed one hundred (100) years at the option of the owner of the brand. The renewal schedule” for “shall not exceed ten (10) years” and “brand pursuant to the renewal schedule established by the board” for “brand every ten (10) years”; in (d) substituted “option to the owner of the brand” for “option to a party,” “brands owned by the same person upon payment” for “brands that the party owns upon payment,” and “the term” for “the ten (10) year term,” and added the last sentence; and in (e) substituted “The owner of a brand” for “A party owning a brand.”

Laws 2020, ch. 76, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2020.

Change of address. —

Subsection (a) implicitly requires a brand owner to inform the state livestock board of her whereabouts; the brand owner is in the best position to know her current address, and it is a simple matter for her to notify the board of any changes to her address. Tate v. Wyoming Livestock Bd., 932 P.2d 746,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1997).

Due process. —

The state livestock board satisfied the due process rights of the owner of a livestock brand by mailing notice of the expiration date of the brand to the owner's prior address; the brand owner had failed to notify the board of her address change, thus making actual notice unfeasible. Tate v. Wyoming Livestock Bd., 932 P.2d 746,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1997).

§ 11-20-116.
Fees
for renewal, transfer of ownership or alteration of brand; recording
bill of sale deemed renewal.

For renewing any brand previously recorded and issuing a certificate of renewal, the board shall charge not less than three hundred dollars ($300.00) for each ten (10) year period, provided that if the renewal is for more than fifty (50) years, the fee shall be not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) for each ten (10) year period beyond fifty (50) years. The fee shall cover any additional species of livestock for which the brand was previously recorded.

For recording a bill of sale or other instrument transferring ownership of a recorded brand and issuing a certificate of transfer, not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) shall be charged for each recorded brand.

The recording of a bill of sale or other instrument transferring ownership of a recorded brand during any renewal period shall not serve as a renewal of the brand. Transfer of ownership and renewal of a brand are separate transactions, for each of which the appropriate fee will be collected.

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 25, § 2.

The fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the account created by W.S.

11-20-405

.

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 69, § 204.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 23, § 6; R.S. 1899, § 1999; C.S. 1910, § 2608; Laws 1913, ch. 126, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 3101; Laws 1925, ch. 48, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 67-213; Laws 1935, ch. 11, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 56-515; Laws 1953, ch. 39, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 11-334; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 6; 1965, ch. 103, § 2; 1971, ch. 83, § 1; 1973, ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, § 11-23-114; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 18, § 1; 1994, ch. 96, § 1; 1996, ch. 25, § 2; 2006, ch. 39, § 2; 2007, ch. 105, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 204; 2020 ch. 76, § 1, effective March 12, 2020.

The 2006 amendment

added (f).

Laws 2006 ch. 39, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2006.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) substituted “not less than three hundred dollars ($300.00)” for “eighty dollars ($80.00)”; in (b) substituted “not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00)” for “fifty dollars ($50.00).”

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, repealed former (f), which read: “Brand renewal, transfers or alterations under this section may be charged a surcharge pursuant to W.S.

11-20-405

.”

The 2020 amendment,

in (a) added “for each ten (10) year period, provided that if the renewal is for more than fifty (50) years, the fee shall be not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) for each ten (10) year period beyond fifty (50) years” at the end of the first sentence.

Laws 2020, ch. 76, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2020.

§ 11-20-117.
Use of unrecorded duplicate brands prohibited; penalties.

It is unlawful for any person in Wyoming to use an unrecorded brand for the purpose of claiming ownership of or to identify livestock with a brand not recorded in his name except as otherwise provided in W.S.

11-20-125

.

Anyone violating subsection (a) of this section shall be punished as provided in W.S.

11-1-103

.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 49, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1945, §§ 56-504, 56-505; Laws 1957, ch. 163, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 11-335, 11-336; W.S. 1977, §§ 11-23-115, 11-23-116; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 2; 2013 ch. 13, §
1., effective February 12, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

rewrote (a).

Laws 2013, ch. 13, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved February 12, 2013.

§ 11-20-118.
Drover's stock; to be kept separate.

Every stock drover shall
keep his livestock separate and distinct from other livestock, and
if his livestock becomes mixed with other livestock the stock drover
shall forthwith separate the same and return any comingled livestock to their lawful owner.

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 39, § 19; R.S. 1899, § 2005; C.S. 1910, § 2613; C.S. 1920, § 3106; R.S. 1931, § 67-218; C.S. 1945, § 56-521; W.S. 1957, § 11-338; W.S. 1977, § 11-23-118; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2013 ch. 13, §
1., effective February 12, 2013; 2013 ch. 13, § 1, effective February 12, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

added “and return any comingled livestock to their lawful owner.”

Laws 2013, ch. 13, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved February 12, 2013.

Cited

in

Haskins v. Andrews, 12 Wyo. 458, 76 P. 588,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(1904).

§ 11-20-119.
Drover's stock; liability for injury to property; exceptions.

Every stock drover shall
prevent his livestock from trespassing upon the property of another
and from damaging any irrigating ditch or public works. No drover
or other person who in good faith removes or attempts to remove livestock
from any road, highway or right-of-way is liable for any civil damages
for acts or omissions in good faith.

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 39, § 21; R.S. 1899, § 2005; C.S. 1910, § 2613; C.S. 1920, § 3106; R.S. 1931, § 67-218; C.S. 1945, § 56-523; W.S. 1957, § 11-339; Laws 1973, ch. 36, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 11-23-119; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

No duty imposed on off-duty police officer. —

There is no common law nor statutory duty which requires an off-duty police officer to corral or warn traffic of stray animals on or near a public roadway. Hill v. Park County, 856 P.2d 456,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of owner of animal for damage to motor vehicle or injury to person riding therein resulting from collision with domestic animal at large in street or highway, 29 ALR4th 431.

Liability for personal injury or death caused by trespassing or intruding livestock, 49 ALR4th 710.

§ 11-20-120.
Driving cattle from home range.

It is unlawful for any
person to drive livestock away from its home range without authority
from the owner of the livestock.

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 39, § 20; R.S. 1899, § 2006; C.S. 1910, § 2614; C.S. 1920, § 3107; R.S. 1931, § 67-219; C.S. 1945, § 56-522; W.S. 1957, § 11-340; W.S. 1977, § 11-23-120; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-20-121.
Penalties for failure to comply with certain provisions.

Any person violating
or failing to comply with the provisions of W.S.

11-20-102

,

11-20-110

or

11-20-118

through

11-20-120

shall be imprisoned in the county jail not exceeding
six (6) months, or fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00)
or more than five hundred dollars ($500.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 39, § 30; R.S. 1899, § 2015; C.S. 1910, § 2628; C.S. 1920, § 3117; R.S. 1931, § 67-228; C.S. 1945, § 56-529; W.S. 1957, § 11-345; W.S. 1977, § 11-23-125; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 2.

§ 11-20-122.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1982,
ch. 75, § 5; 1983, ch. 171, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1899, ch. 3, §§ 1 and 2, related to obtaining service from a bull.

§ 11-20-123.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007,
ch. 105, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1913, ch. 5, §§ 1, 2, related to the number of bulls required on open range; qualifications; penalties; obtaining service from a bull.

§ 11-20-124.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2001,
ch 26, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1979, ch. 63, § 1, required owners to brand bison.

§ 11-20-125.
Use of a seasonal brand; application for an annual permit to
use an out-of-state brand.

A person may apply to the board for permission to use his out-of-state brand on cattle, horses, asses or mules, provided the brand is legally registered in the state of origin. If a conflict is found with a registered Wyoming brand the board, notwithstanding W.S.

11-20-104

and

11-20-117

and as established by rule and regulation, may authorize use of the brand and require further identification. The permit shall be valid for a one hundred eighty (180) day period during the calendar year. The permit is not transferable. The annual fee for the permit shall be the same as the fee for a new brand as prescribed in W.S.

11-20-103

. The permit may be issued and renewed annually if the board finds the requirements of this section are met:

The applicant shall agree to restrict a permitted out-of-state brand on calves born to cattle imported for grazing purposes, yearling, feeder or stocker cattle imported for feeding or grazing or cattle consigned to a commercial feedlot. “Calves” for purposes of this section means calves less than six (6) months old and running at their mother’s sides;

The applicant shall supply the brand inspector proof of ownership of the cattle at the time of brand inspection and shall show proof that the out-of-state brand is currently registered either by brand card or brand certificate from the state of issue; and

If the permit is issued, the permittee shall pay for all necessary brand inspections as prescribed by law.

If there are written complaints to the board from three (3) or more affected parties, the board shall investigate the complaints and take appropriate action.

The board may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 38, § 1; 2013 ch. 13, § 1., effective February 12, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

added “horses, asses or mules” in (a).

Laws 2013, ch. 13, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved February 12, 2013.

§ 11-20-126.
Permanently recorded brand. [Repealed]

History.

2019 ch. 148, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; repealed by 2020 ch. 76, § 2, effective March 12, 2020.